smi/src/morphology/stems/smi-acronyms.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


!! !!!North Saami acronyms - stems

!! This file contains a loop for random capital-letter acronyms, 
!! as well as two lists of common acronyms: letter-number acronyms and 
!! small-capital letter combinations.

!! !!The main part

LEXICON Acronym-smi   !!= * __@CODE@__ divides the acros in the 3 types just mentioned.

 +Use/Circ+Use/SpellNoSugg: FIRSTLETTER  ; ! Dynamically generated acronyms,
                                           ! Remove these from nonrec?
                                           ! between two and four letters long.
                            LETTERNUMBER ; ! Listed (still not monitored)
                                           ! Perhaps we should allow for a
                                           ! final arabic number at the end of
                                           ! the acronyms, the NRK and NRK2
                                           ! pattern.
                            Acronym-list ; ! Regular acronyms
                            smallacro-smi ;! This is a pointer to a lexicon of
                                           ! manually listed small-letter
                                           ! acronyms. They are not generated,
                                           ! since it would interfer with the
                                           ! ordinary transducer, but listed
                                           ! here, as they then can point to
                                           ! the same ACRO_vow lexicon as the
                                           ! generated capital-letter acronyms.
!                           quasiacro    ; ! move to LEXICON HyphNouns. This is
                                           ! compounds with acronyms in the
                                           ! beginning. They are here since
                                           ! they make compounds with hyphen to
 ALPHABET ;                                          ! the left.

!! !!The acro generator

LEXICON FIRSTLETTER	   !!= * __@CODE@__  instead of regex, a 4-letter loop for random acronyms
 B SCND ; C SCND ; Č SCND ; D SCND ; Đ SCND ; F SCND ; G SCND ; 	
 H SCND ; J SCND ; K SCND ; L SCND ; M SCND ; N SCND ; Ŋ SCND ; 	
 P SCND ; Q SCND ; R SCND ; S SCND ; Š SCND ; T SCND ; Ŧ SCND ; V SCND ; 	
 W SCND ; X SCND ; Z SCND ; Ž SCND ; 								
 A SCND ; Á SCND ; E SCND ; I SCND ; O SCND ; U SCND ; 				
 Æ SCND ; Ø SCND ; Y SCND ; Ä SCND ; Ö SCND ; Å SCND ; 				



LEXICON SCND													   !!= * __@CODE@__ second part of loop
 B THRD ; C THRD ; Č THRD ; D THRD ; Đ THRD ; F THRD ; G THRD ;	
 H THRD ; J THRD ; K THRD ; L THRD ; M THRD ; N THRD ; Ŋ THRD ;	
 P THRD ; Q THRD ; R THRD ; S THRD ; Š THRD ; T THRD ; Ŧ THRD ; V THRD ;
 W THRD ; X THRD ; Z THRD ; Ž THRD ; 							
 A THRD ; Á THRD ; E THRD ; I THRD ; O THRD ; U THRD ; 			
 Æ THRD ; Ø THRD ; Y THRD ; Ä THRD ; Ö THRD ; Å THRD ; 			
 %-:∑- IDNUMBER ; 											           ! N-9520 Kárášjohka
 +Use/-Spell: IDNUMBER ;

LEXICON THRD													   !!= * __@CODE@__ third part of loop
 B FRTH ; C FRTH ; Č FRTH ; D FRTH ; Đ FRTH ; F FRTH ; G FRTH ;	
 H FRTH ; J FRTH ; K FRTH ; L FRTH ; M FRTH ; N FRTH ; Ŋ FRTH ;	
 P FRTH ; Q FRTH ; R FRTH ; S FRTH ; Š FRTH ; T FRTH ; Ŧ FRTH ; V FRTH ;	
 W FRTH ; X FRTH ; Z FRTH ; Ž FRTH ; 							
 A FRTH ; Á FRTH ; E FRTH ; I FRTH ; O FRTH ; U FRTH ;			
 Æ FRTH ; Ø FRTH ; Y FRTH ; Ä FRTH ; Ö FRTH ; Å FRTH ;			
 %-:∑- IDNUMBER ; 											           ! N-9520 Kárášjohka
 +Use/-Spell: IDNUMBER ;
   DYN_ACRO_vow ;														

LEXICON FRTH													   !!= * __@CODE@__ fourth part of loop
 B DYN_ACRO_cons ; C DYN_ACRO_cons ; Č DYN_ACRO_cons ; D DYN_ACRO_cons ; Đ DYN_ACRO_cons ; F DYN_ACRO_cons ; G DYN_ACRO_cons ;
 H DYN_ACRO_cons ; J DYN_ACRO_cons ; K DYN_ACRO_cons ; L DYN_ACRO_cons ; M DYN_ACRO_cons ; N DYN_ACRO_cons ; Ŋ DYN_ACRO_cons ;
 P DYN_ACRO_cons ; Q DYN_ACRO_cons ; R DYN_ACRO_cons ; S DYN_ACRO_cons ; Š DYN_ACRO_cons ; T DYN_ACRO_cons ; Ŧ DYN_ACRO_cons ; V DYN_ACRO_cons ;
 W DYN_ACRO_cons ; X DYN_ACRO_cons ; Z DYN_ACRO_cons ; Ž DYN_ACRO_cons ; 							
 A DYN_ACRO_vow ; Á DYN_ACRO_vow ; E DYN_ACRO_vow ; I DYN_ACRO_vow ; O DYN_ACRO_vow ; U DYN_ACRO_vow ; 			
 Æ DYN_ACRO_vow ; Ø DYN_ACRO_vow ; Y DYN_ACRO_vow ; Ä DYN_ACRO_vow ; Ö DYN_ACRO_vow ; Å DYN_ACRO_vow ;			
 %-:∑- IDNUMBER ; 											           ! N-9520 Kárášjohka
 +Use/-Spell: IDNUMBER ;
 DYN_ACRO_cons ;															
 DYN_ACRO_cons ;															
! # ; !To prevent cases like :as, `as and as. But this gives tagless 3-letter ACR.

LEXICON IDNUMBER
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > IDNUMBERLOOP ;

LEXICON IDNUMBERLOOP ! this gives A2, AB1234, A-3245.
IDNUMBER ; ! looping back
DYN_ACRO_cons ; ! same tag as the acronyms


!! Here is the list of acronym nouns (not propernouns)

LEXICON ALPHABET ! For Apertium
< [A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|Y|Z|Æ|Ø|Å|Á|Â|Ô|Š|Č] >  ALPHABET-TAGS ;
a:A ALPHABET-TAGS ;
b:B ALPHABET-TAGS ;
c:C ALPHABET-TAGS ;
d:D ALPHABET-TAGS ;
e:E ALPHABET-TAGS ;
f:F ALPHABET-TAGS ;
g:G ALPHABET-TAGS ;
h:H ALPHABET-TAGS ;
i:I ALPHABET-TAGS ;
j:J ALPHABET-TAGS ;
k:K ALPHABET-TAGS ;
l:L ALPHABET-TAGS ;
m:M ALPHABET-TAGS ;
n:N ALPHABET-TAGS ;
o:O ALPHABET-TAGS ;
p:P ALPHABET-TAGS ;
q:Q ALPHABET-TAGS ;
r:R ALPHABET-TAGS ;
s:S ALPHABET-TAGS ;
t:T ALPHABET-TAGS ;
u:U ALPHABET-TAGS ;
v:V ALPHABET-TAGS ;
w:W ALPHABET-TAGS ;
x:X ALPHABET-TAGS ;
y:Y ALPHABET-TAGS ;
z:Z ALPHABET-TAGS ;
æ:Æ ALPHABET-TAGS ;
ø:Ø ALPHABET-TAGS ;
å:Å ALPHABET-TAGS ;
ä:Ä ALPHABET-TAGS ;
ö:Ö ALPHABET-TAGS ;
á:Á ALPHABET-TAGS ;
š:Š ALPHABET-TAGS ;
č:Č ALPHABET-TAGS ;

LEXICON ALPHABET-TAGS ! For apertium
alphabet+N+Sem/Sign: ab-noun ;
